New York, session 2025-2026, S8316.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 643 of the laws of 2019 amending the 2 local finance law, relating to establishing an electronic open auction 3 bond sale pilot program, as amended by chapter 297 of the laws of 2023, 4 is amended to read as follows: 5 § 2. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 6 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall expire [six] 7 eight years after such effective date, when upon such date the 8 provisions of this act shall be deemed repealed. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11975-01-5